Massachusetts, session 194th, S381.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 37H of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “department”, in line 10, the following words:- “.
Said policies shall prohibit the use of cell phones by students during instructional time, except
when expressly directed by a teacher”.
of 1